Georgia, session 2025_26, HB69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
PART I
An Act making and providing appropriations for the State Fiscal Year beginning July 1,
2024, and ending June 30, 2025, known as the "General Appropriations Act," Act No. 709,
approved May 7, 2024, is amended by striking everything following the Part I designation
up to but not including the Part II designation and by substituting in lieu thereof the
following:
H. B. 69
- 1 -

LC 33 9758
"The sums of money hereinafter provided are appropriated for the State Fiscal Year
beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025, as prescribed hereinafter for such fiscal
year:"
PART II
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
PART III
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 69
- 2 -